North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-31 Professional Organizations Act
10-31-13.1.
Foreign professional organizations — Practice in the state.

A foreign professional organization may practice a profession in this state only through executives, owners, employees, and agents who are licensed to practice the profession in this state. The practice of a profession in this state by a foreign professional organization is subject to the laws and regulations of this state governing the practice of such professional service.

The certificate of authority of a foreign professional organization may be revoked by the secretary of state as provided in this chapter, if the foreign professional organization fails to comply with this chapter.

This chapter does not prohibit the practice of a profession in this state by an individual who is an executive, owner, employee, or agent of a foreign professional organization, if the individual could lawfully practice the profession in this state in the absence of any relationship to a foreign professional organization.

This section applies regardless of whether the foreign professional organization is authorized to practice a profession in this state.

A foreign professional organization may render only one specific type of professional service and services ancillary thereto in this state. A foreign professional organization may not engage in any business in this state other than rendering the professional service it is authorized to render and services ancillary thereto.

The provisions of chapter 10-19.1, applicable to foreign corporations, apply to a foreign professional organization rendering professional services in this state in the form of a foreign corporation. Such a foreign professional organization enjoys the powers and privileges and is subject to the duties, restrictions, and liabilities of other foreign corporations doing business in this state, except when inconsistent with the letter and purpose of the provisions of this chapter applicable to foreign professional organizations.

A foreign professional organization rendering professional services in this state in the form of a foreign corporation shall include in its application for a certificate of authority under section 10-19.1-135 or its annual report under section 10-19.1-146 the following information:

The profession to be practiced by the foreign corporation;

The names and residence addresses of all directors and shareholders of the corporation who practice the profession in this state; and

In an application for a certificate of authority, a certificate from the regulating board of the profession involved that all directors and shareholders who practice the profession in this state are licensed in this state to render the same professional service as those for which the corporation was formed; and in an annual report, a statement that all directors and shareholders who practice the profession in this state are licensed in this state to render the same professional service as those for which the corporation was formed.

The provisions of chapter 10-32.1 applicable to foreign limited liability companies apply to a foreign professional organization rendering professional services in this state in the form of a foreign limited liability company. Such a foreign professional organization enjoys the powers and privileges and is subject to the duties, restrictions, and liabilities of other foreign limited liability companies doing business in this state, except when inconsistent with the letter and purpose of the provisions of this chapter applicable to foreign professional organizations.

A foreign professional organization rendering professional services in this state in the form of a foreign limited liability company shall include in its application for a certificate of authority under section 10-32.1-75 or its annual report under section 10-32.1-89 the following information:

The profession to be practiced by the foreign limited liability company;

The names and residence addresses of all members or managers of the limited liability company who practice the profession in this state; and

In an application for a certificate of authority, a certificate from the regulating board of the profession involved that all members or managers who practice the profession in this state are licensed in this state to render the same professional service as those for which the limited liability company was formed; and in an annual report, a statement that all members or managers who practice the profession in this state are licensed in this state to render the same professional service as those for which the limited liability company was formed.

The provisions of chapter 45-22 applicable to foreign limited liability partnerships apply to a foreign professional organization rendering professional services in this state in the form of a foreign limited liability partnership. Such a foreign professional organization enjoys the powers and privileges and is subject to the duties, restrictions, and liabilities of other foreign limited liability partnerships doing business in this state, except when inconsistent with the letter and purpose of the provisions of this chapter applicable to foreign professional organizations.

A foreign professional organization rendering professional services in this state in the form of a foreign limited liability partnership shall include in its registration under section 45-22-03 the following information:

The profession to be practiced by the foreign limited liability partnership;

The names and residence addresses of all partners of the limited liability partnership who practice the profession in this state; and

In a registration, a certificate from the regulating board of the profession involved that all partners who practice the profession in this state are licensed in this state to render the same professional service as those for which the limited liability partnership was formed.

The name of a foreign professional organization rendering professional services in this state shall contain words or abbreviations required or authorized by the laws of the jurisdiction in which the foreign professional organization is incorporated, organized, or originally registered.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 85, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 69; 1995, ch. 55, § 24; 1997, ch. 103, § 98; 2001, ch. 112, § 14; 2015, ch. 87, § 18, effective July 1, 2015.

10-31-14.
Construction.

This chapter must be construed to effectuate its general purpose of making available to professional individuals the benefits of the corporate form, the benefits of the limited liability company form, and the benefits of the limited liability partnership form.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 106, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 70; 1995, ch. 55, § 25.